Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 19.290.020 and 2024 c 301 s 4 are each amended to read as follows:(1) At the time of a transaction, every scrap metal business doing business in this state shall produce wherever that business is conducted an accurate and legible record of each transaction involving nonferrous metal property. This record must be written in the English language, documented on a standardized form or in electronic form, and contain the following information:(a) The signature of the person with whom the transaction is made;(b) The time, date, location, and value of the transaction;(c) The name of the employee representing the scrap metal business in the transaction;(d) The name, street address, and telephone number of the person with whom the transaction is made;(e) The license plate number and state of issuance of the license plate on the motor vehicle used to deliver the nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;(f) A description of the motor vehicle used to deliver the nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction;(g) The current driver's license number or other government-issued picture identification card number of the seller or a copy of the seller's government-issued picture identification card; and(h) A description of the predominant types of nonferrous metal property subject to the transaction, utilizing the institute of scrap recycling industries' generally accepted terminology, and including weight, quantity, or volume.(2) For every transaction that involves nonferrous metal property, every scrap metal business doing business in the state shall require the person with whom a transaction is being made to sign a declaration. The declaration may be included as part of the transactional record required under subsection (1) of this section, or on a receipt for the transaction. The declaration must state substantially the following:"I, the undersigned, affirm under penalty of law that the property that is subject to this transaction is not to the best of my knowledge stolen property."The declaration must be signed and dated by the person with whom the transaction is being made. An employee of the scrap metal business must witness the signing and dating of the declaration and sign the declaration accordingly before any transaction may be consummated.(3) The record and declaration required under this section must be open to the inspection of any commissioned law enforcement officer of the state or any of its political subdivisions at all times during the ordinary hours of business, or at reasonable times if ordinary hours of business are not kept, and must be maintained wherever that business is conducted for five years following the date of the transaction.(4) It is unlawful to sell or offer to sell records of transactions involving nonferrous metal property as described in this section.Sec. 2. RCW 19.290.030 and 2024 c 301 s 5 are each amended to read as follows:(1) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive nonferrous metal property from any person who cannot produce at least one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a valid driver's license or identification card issued by any state.(2) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive commercial metal property unless the seller: (a) Has a commercial account with the scrap metal business; (b) can prove ownership of the property by producing written documentation that the seller is the owner of the property; or (c) can produce written documentation that the seller is an employee or agent authorized to sell the property on behalf of a commercial enterprise.(3) No scrap metal business may enter into a transaction to purchase or receive metallic wire that was burned in whole or in part to remove insulation unless the seller can produce written proof to the scrap metal business that the wire was lawfully burned.(4)(a) No transaction involving nonferrous metal property may be made in cash or with any person who does not provide a street address and photographic identification and sign a declaration under the requirements of RCW 19.290.020 except as described in (b) of this subsection. The person with whom the transaction is being made may only be paid by a stored value device, electronic funds transfer, other electronic payment method, or a nontransferable check, mailed by the scrap metal business to a street address provided under RCW 19.290.020, no earlier than three days after the transaction was made. A transaction occurs on the date provided in the record required under RCW 19.290.020.(b) A scrap metal business that is in compliance with this chapter may pay up to a maximum of $30 in ((cash,))a stored value device((,)) or electronic funds transfer for nonferrous metal property. The balance of the value of the transaction may be made by nontransferable check, stored value device, or electronic funds transfer at the time the transaction is made if the scrap metal business digitally captures:(i) A copy of one piece of current government-issued picture identification, including a current driver's license or identification card issued by any state; and(ii) Either a picture or video of either the material subject to the transaction in the form received or the material subject to the transaction within the vehicle which the material was transported to the scrap metal business.(c) The requirements in this subsection do not apply to transactions conducted between commercial accounts.(5)(a) A scrap metal business's usage of video surveillance shall be sufficient to comply with subsection (4)(b)(ii) of this section so long as the video captures the material subject to the transaction.(b) A digital image or picture taken under this section must be available for two years from the date of transaction, while a video recording must be available for 30 days.(6) No scrap metal business may purchase or receive beer kegs from anyone except a manufacturer of beer kegs or licensed brewery.Sec. 3. RCW 19.290.040 and 2024 c 301 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Every scrap metal business must create and maintain a permanent record with a commercial enterprise, including another scrap metal business, in order to establish a commercial account. That record, at a minimum, must include the following information:(a) The full name of the commercial enterprise or commercial account;(b) The business address and telephone number of the commercial enterprise or commercial account; and(c) The full name of the person employed by the commercial enterprise who is authorized to deliver nonferrous metal property and commercial metal property to the scrap metal business.(2) The record maintained by a scrap metal business for a commercial account must document every purchase or receipt of nonferrous metal property and commercial metal property from the commercial enterprise. The record must be maintained for three years following the date of the transfer or receipt. The documentation must include, at a minimum, the following information:(a) The time, date, and value of the property being purchased or received;(b) A description of the predominant types of property being purchased or received; and(c) The signature of the person delivering the property to the scrap metal business.(3) It is unlawful to sell or offer to sell a record maintained by a scrap metal business as described in this section.Sec. 4. RCW 19.290.080 and 2024 c 301 s 9 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Each violation of the requirements of this chapter that are not subject to criminal penalties shall be a civil penalty punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.(2) Within two years of a violation of any of the requirements of this chapter that results in a civil penalty under this section, each subsequent violation shall be punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000.(3)(a) A scrap metal business that engages in a pledge for, the purchase of, or the trade of stolen copper that was used in telecommunication cable, the theft of which can result in disruption to emergency telecommunications services, is liable for a civil penalty of:(i) Not more than $10,000 for a first violation; and(ii) Not more than $20,000 for a second violation.(b) A third violation of this subsection must result in loss of licensure.Sec. 5. RCW 19.290.140 and 2013 c 322 s 16 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A license issued on the scrap metal license application remains in force until suspended or revoked and may be renewed annually upon reapplication and upon payment of the required fee. A licensee who fails or neglects to renew the license before the assigned expiration date shall pay the fee for an original scrap metal license as provided in this chapter.(2) Whenever a scrap metal processor, recycler, or supplier ceases to do business as such or the license has been suspended or revoked, the licensee shall immediately surrender the license to the department of licensing.(3) A scrap metal business that commits three violations under RCW 19.290.080 must immediately surrender the license to the department of licensing.Sec. 6. RCW 9A.82.010 and 2024 c 301 s 27 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context requires the contrary, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1)(a) "Beneficial interest" means:(i) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee for the trust holds legal or record title to real property;(ii) The interest of a person as a beneficiary under any other trust arrangement under which a trustee holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the beneficiary; or(iii) The interest of a person under any other form of express fiduciary arrangement under which one person holds legal or record title to real property for the benefit of the other person.(b) "Beneficial interest" does not include the interest of a stockholder in a corporation or the interest of a partner in a general partnership or limited partnership.(c) A beneficial interest is considered to be located where the real property owned by the trustee is located.(2) "Control" means the possession of a sufficient interest to permit substantial direction over the affairs of an enterprise.(3) "Creditor" means a person making an extension of credit or a person claiming by, under, or through a person making an extension of credit.(4) "Criminal profiteering" means any act, including any anticipatory or completed offense, committed for financial gain, that is chargeable or indictable under the laws of the state in which the act occurred and, if the act occurred in a state other than this state, would be chargeable or indictable under the laws of this state had the act occurred in this state and punishable as a felony and by imprisonment for more than one year, regardless of whether the act is charged or indicted, as any of the following:(a) Murder, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030 and 9A.32.050;(b) Robbery, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200 and 9A.56.210;(c) Kidnapping, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020 and 9A.40.030;(d) Forgery, as defined in RCW 9A.60.020 and 9A.60.030;(e) Theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.030, 9A.56.040, 9A.56.060, 9A.56.080, and 9A.56.083;(f) Unlawful sale of subscription television services, as defined in RCW 9A.56.230;(g) Theft of telecommunication services or unlawful manufacture of a telecommunication device, as defined in RCW 9A.56.262 and 9A.56.264;(h) Child selling or child buying, as defined in RCW 9A.64.030;(i) Bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.010, 9A.68.020, 9A.68.040, and 9A.68.050;(j) Gambling, as defined in RCW 9.46.220 ((and)), 9.46.215, and 9.46.217;(k) Extortion, as defined in RCW 9A.56.120 and 9A.56.130;(l) Unlawful production of payment instruments, unlawful possession of payment instruments, unlawful possession of a personal identification device, unlawful possession of fictitious identification, or unlawful possession of instruments of financial fraud, as defined in RCW 9A.56.320;(m) Extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.020;(n) Advancing money for use in an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.030;(o) Collection of an extortionate extension of credit, as defined in RCW 9A.82.040;(p) Collection of an unlawful debt, as defined in RCW 9A.82.045;(q) Delivery or manufacture of controlled substances or possession with intent to deliver or manufacture controlled substances under chapter 69.50 RCW;(r) Trafficking in stolen property, as defined in RCW 9A.82.050;(s) Leading organized crime, as defined in RCW 9A.82.060;(t) Money laundering, as defined in RCW 9A.83.020;(u) Obstructing criminal investigations or prosecutions in violation of RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100, 9A.72.110, 9A.72.120, 9A.72.130, 9A.76.070, or 9A.76.180;(v) Fraud in the purchase or sale of securities, as defined in RCW 21.20.010;(w) Promoting pornography, as defined in RCW 9.68.140;(x) Sexual exploitation of children, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040, 9.68A.050, and 9.68A.060;(y) Promoting prostitution, as defined in RCW 9A.88.070 and 9A.88.080;(z) Arson, as defined in RCW 9A.48.020 and 9A.48.030;(aa) Assault, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011 and 9A.36.021;(bb) Assault of a child, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120 and 9A.36.130;(cc) A pattern of equity skimming, as defined in RCW 61.34.020;(dd) Commercial telephone solicitation in violation of RCW 19.158.040(1);(ee) Trafficking in insurance claims, as defined in RCW 48.30A.015;(ff) Unlawful practice of law, as defined in RCW 2.48.180;(gg) Commercial bribery, as defined in RCW 9A.68.060;(hh) Health care false claims, as defined in RCW 48.80.030;(ii) Unlicensed practice of a profession or business, as defined in RCW 18.130.190(7);(jj) Improperly obtaining financial information, as defined in RCW 9.35.010;(kk) Identity theft, as defined in RCW 9.35.020;(ll) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW 70.155.105(6) (a) or (b);(mm) Unlawful shipment of cigarettes in violation of RCW 82.24.110(2);(nn) Unauthorized sale or procurement of telephone records in violation of RCW 9.26A.140;(oo) Theft with the intent to resell, as defined in RCW 9A.56.340;(pp) Organized retail theft, as defined in RCW 9A.56.350;(qq) Mortgage fraud, as defined in RCW 19.144.080;(rr) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.100;(ss) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.101;(tt) Trafficking, as defined in RCW 9A.40.100, promoting travel for commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.102, and permitting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.103; ((or))(uu) Trafficking in catalytic converters, as defined in RCW 9A.82.190 and 9A.82.200; or(vv) Destruction of critical communications infrastructure, as described in section 7 of this act.(5) "Dealer in property" means a person who buys and sells property as a business.(6) "Debtor" means a person to whom an extension of credit is made or a person who guarantees the repayment of an extension of credit or in any manner undertakes to indemnify the creditor against loss resulting from the failure of a person to whom an extension is made to repay the same.(7) "Documentary material" means any book, paper, document, writing, drawing, graph, chart, photograph, phonograph record, magnetic tape, computer printout, other data compilation from which information can be obtained or from which information can be translated into usable form, or other tangible item.(8) "Enterprise" includes any individual, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, business trust, or other profit or nonprofit legal entity, and includes any union, association, or group of individuals associated in fact although not a legal entity, and both illicit and licit enterprises and governmental and nongovernmental entities.(9) "Extortionate extension of credit" means an extension of credit with respect to which it is the understanding of the creditor and the debtor at the time the extension is made that delay in making repayment or failure to make repayment could result in the use of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person.(10) "Extortionate means" means the use, or an express or implicit threat of use, of violence or other criminal means to cause harm to the person, reputation, or property of any person.(11) "Financial institution" means any bank, trust company, savings and loan association, savings bank, mutual savings bank, credit union, or loan company under the jurisdiction of the state or an agency of the United States.(12) "Pattern of criminal profiteering activity" means engaging in at least three acts of criminal profiteering, one of which occurred after July 1, 1985, and the last of which occurred within five years, excluding any period of imprisonment, after the commission of the earliest act of criminal profiteering. In order to constitute a pattern, the three acts must have the same or similar intent, results, accomplices, principals, victims, or methods of commission, or be otherwise interrelated by distinguishing characteristics including a nexus to the same enterprise, and must not be isolated events. However, in any civil proceedings brought pursuant to RCW 9A.82.100 by any person other than the attorney general or county prosecuting attorney in which one or more acts of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities are asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity, it is a condition to civil liability under RCW 9A.82.100 that the defendant has been convicted in a criminal proceeding of fraud in the purchase or sale of securities under RCW 21.20.400 or under the laws of another state or of the United States requiring the same elements of proof, but such conviction need not relate to any act or acts asserted as acts of criminal profiteering activity in such civil action under RCW 9A.82.100.(13) "Real property" means any real property or interest in real property, including but not limited to a land sale contract, lease, or mortgage of real property.(14) "Records" means any book, paper, writing, record, computer program, or other material.(15) "Repayment of an extension of credit" means the repayment, satisfaction, or discharge in whole or in part of a debt or claim, acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, resulting from or in connection with that extension of credit.(16) "Stolen property" means property that has been obtained by theft, robbery, or extortion.(17) "To collect an extension of credit" means to induce in any way a person to make repayment thereof.(18) "To extend credit" means to make or renew a loan or to enter into an agreement, tacit or express, whereby the repayment or satisfaction of a debt or claim, whether acknowledged or disputed, valid or invalid, and however arising, may or shall be deferred.(19) "Traffic" means to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of stolen property to another person, or to buy, receive, possess, or obtain control of stolen property, with intent to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of the property to another person.(20)(a) "Trustee" means:(i) A person acting as a trustee under a trust established under Title 11 RCW in which the trustee holds legal or record title to real property;(ii) A person who holds legal or record title to real property in which another person has a beneficial interest; or(iii) A successor trustee to a person who is a trustee under (a)(i) or (ii) of this subsection.(b) "Trustee" does not mean a person appointed or acting as:(i) A personal representative under Title 11 RCW;(ii) A trustee of any testamentary trust;(iii) A trustee of any indenture of trust under which a bond is issued; or(iv) A trustee under a deed of trust.(21) "Unlawful debt" means any money or other thing of value constituting principal or interest of a debt that is legally unenforceable in the state in full or in part because the debt was incurred or contracted:(a) In violation of any one of the following:(i) Chapter 67.16 RCW relating to horse racing;(ii) Chapter 9.46 RCW relating to gambling;(b) In a gambling activity in violation of federal law; or(c) In connection with the business of lending money or a thing of value at a rate that is at least twice the permitted rate under the applicable state or federal law relating to usury.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW to read as follows:(1) A person is guilty of destruction of critical communications infrastructure if, with intent to cause damage, commit theft, or cause harm to communications infrastructure including both physical and cyber components that deliver voice, video, and data services, he or she causes damage to or renders inoperable such voice, video, or data services.(2) Destruction of critical communications infrastructure is a class C felony.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. A new section is added to chapter 9A.56 RCW to read as follows:(1) In addition to the criminal penalties provided in section 7 of this act, there is created a civil cause of action for destruction of critical communications infrastructure.(2) A person who sustains injury to his or her person, business, or property by an act described in section 7 of this act may file an action in superior court against the perpetrator for the recovery of damages and the costs of the suit, including reasonable investigative and attorneys' fees and costs.Sec. 9. RCW 9.94A.515 and 2025 c 220 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:Â TABLE 2Â Â CRIMES INCLUDED WITHIN EACH SERIOUSNESS LEVELÂ XVIAggravated Murder 1 (RCW 10.95.020)Â XVHomicide by abuse (RCW 9A.32.055)Â Â Malicious explosion 1 (RCW 70.74.280(1))Â Â Murder 1 (RCW 9A.32.030)Â XIVMurder 2 (RCW 9A.32.050)Â Â Trafficking 1 (RCW 9A.40.100(1))Â XIIIMalicious explosion 2 (RCW 70.74.280(2))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 1 (RCW 70.74.270(1))Â XIIAssault 1 (RCW 9A.36.011)Â Â Assault of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.36.120)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 1 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(a))Â Â Promoting Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.101)Â Â Rape 1 (RCW 9A.44.040)Â Â Rape of a Child 1 (RCW 9A.44.073)Â Â Trafficking 2 (RCW 9A.40.100(3))Â XIManslaughter 1 (RCW 9A.32.060)Â Â Rape 2 (RCW 9A.44.050)Â Â Rape of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.44.076)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 46.61.520)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by the operation of any vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.520)Â XChild Molestation 1 (RCW 9A.44.083)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 1 (RCW 9A.42.020)Â Â Indecent Liberties (with forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a))Â Â Kidnapping 1 (RCW 9A.40.020)Â Â Leading Organized Crime (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(a))Â Â Malicious explosion 3 (RCW 70.74.280(3))Â Â Sexually Violent Predator Escape (RCW 9A.76.115)Â IXAbandonment of Dependent Person 1 (RCW 9A.42.060)Â Â Assault of a Child 2 (RCW 9A.36.130)Â Â Explosive devices prohibited (RCW 70.74.180)Â Â Hit and RunâDeath (RCW 46.52.020(4)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Inciting Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.060(1)(b))Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 2 (RCW 70.74.270(2))Â Â Robbery 1 (RCW 9A.56.200)Â Â Sexual Exploitation (RCW 9.68A.040)Â VIIIArson 1 (RCW 9A.48.020)Â Â Commercial Sexual Abuse of a Minor (RCW 9.68A.100)Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by the operation of any vessel in a reckless manner (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Manslaughter 2 (RCW 9A.32.070)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 1 (RCW 9A.88.070)Â Â Theft of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.010)Â VIIAir bag diagnostic systems (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(2)(b))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.660(1)(b))Â Â Burglary 1 (RCW 9A.52.020)Â Â Child Molestation 2 (RCW 9A.44.086)Â Â Civil Disorder Training (RCW 9A.48.120)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 1 (RCW 9A.44.160)Â Â Dealing in depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.050(1))Â Â Drive-by Shooting (RCW 9A.36.045)Â Â False Reporting 1 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(a))Â Â Homicide by Watercraft, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 79A.60.050)Â Â Indecent Liberties (without forcible compulsion) (RCW 9A.44.100(1) (b) and (c))Â Â Introducing Contraband 1 (RCW 9A.76.140)Â Â Malicious placement of an explosive 3 (RCW 70.74.270(3))Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (causing bodily injury or death) (RCW 46.37.650(1)(b))Â Â Negligently Causing Death By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.675)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(b))Â Â Sending, bringing into state depictions of minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.060(1))Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Firearm in the first degree (RCW 9.41.040(1))Â Â Use of a Machine Gun or Bump-fire Stock in Commission of a Felony (RCW 9.41.225)Â Â Vehicular Homicide, by disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.520)Â VIBail Jumping with Murder 1 (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(a))Â Â Bribery (RCW 9A.68.010)Â Â Incest 1 (RCW 9A.64.020(1))Â Â Intimidating a Judge (RCW 9A.72.160)Â Â Intimidating a Juror/Witness (RCW 9A.72.110, 9A.72.130)Â Â Malicious placement of an imitation device 2 (RCW 70.74.272(1)(b))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.070(1))Â Â Rape of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.44.079)Â Â Theft of a Firearm (RCW 9A.56.300)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 1 (RCW 9A.56.400(1))Â Â Unlawful Storage of Ammonia (RCW 69.55.020)Â VAbandonment of Dependent Person 2 (RCW 9A.42.070)Â Â Advancing money or property for extortionate extension of credit (RCW 9A.82.030)Â Â Air bag diagnostic systems (RCW 46.37.660(2)(c))Â Â Air bag replacement requirements (RCW 46.37.660(1)(c))Â Â Bail Jumping with class A Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(b))Â Â Child Molestation 3 (RCW 9A.44.089)Â Â Criminal Mistreatment 2 (RCW 9A.42.030)Â Â Custodial Sexual Misconduct 2 (RCW 9A.44.170)Â Â Dealing in Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.050(2))Â Â Domestic Violence Court Order Violation (RCW 7.105.450, 10.99.040, 10.99.050, 26.09.300, 26.26B.050, or 26.52.070)Â Â Extortion 1 (RCW 9A.56.120)Â Â Extortionate Extension of Credit (RCW 9A.82.020)Â Â Extortionate Means to Collect Extensions of Credit (RCW 9A.82.040)Â Â Incest 2 (RCW 9A.64.020(2))Â Â Kidnapping 2 (RCW 9A.40.030)Â Â Manufacture or import counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed air bag (RCW 46.37.650(1)(c))Â Â Perjury 1 (RCW 9A.72.020)Â Â Persistent prison misbehavior (RCW 9.94.070)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Firearm (RCW 9A.56.310)Â Â Rape 3 (RCW 9A.44.060)Â Â Rendering Criminal Assistance 1 (RCW 9A.76.070)Â Â Sell, install, or reinstall counterfeit, nonfunctional, damaged, or previously deployed airbag (RCW 46.37.650(2)(c))Â Â Sending, Bringing into State Depictions of Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.060(2))Â Â Sexual Misconduct with a Minor 1 (RCW 9A.44.093)Â Â Sexually Violating Human Remains (RCW 9A.44.105)Â Â Stalking (RCW 9A.46.110)Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 1 (RCW 9A.56.070)Â IVAnimal Fighting (with intentional mutilation) (RCW 16.52.117(2)(b))Â Â Arson 2 (RCW 9A.48.030)Â Â Assault 2 (RCW 9A.36.021)Â Â Assault 3 (of a Peace Officer with a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031(1)(h))Â Â Assault 4 (third domestic violence offense) (RCW 9A.36.041(3))Â Â Assault by Watercraft (RCW 79A.60.060)Â Â Bribing a Witness/Bribe Received by Witness (RCW 9A.72.090, 9A.72.100)Â Â Cheating 1 (RCW 9.46.1961)Â Â Commercial Bribery (RCW 9A.68.060)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(4))Â Â Driving While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.502(6))Â Â Endangerment with a Controlled Substance (RCW 9A.42.100)Â Â Escape 1 (RCW 9A.76.110)Â Â Hate Crime (RCW 9A.36.080)Â Â Hit and RunâInjury (RCW 46.52.020(4)(b))Â Â Hit and Run with VesselâInjury Accident (RCW 79A.60.200(3))Â Â Identity Theft 1 (RCW 9.35.020(2))Â Â Indecent Exposure to Person Under Age 14 (subsequent sex offense) (RCW 9A.88.010)Â Â Influencing Outcome of Sporting Event (RCW 9A.82.070)Â Â Physical Control of a Vehicle While Under the Influence (RCW 46.61.504(6))Â Â Possession of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 2 (RCW 9.68A.070(2))Â Â Residential Burglary (RCW 9A.52.025)Â Â Robbery 2 (RCW 9A.56.210)Â Â Theft of Livestock 1 (RCW 9A.56.080)Â Â Threats to Bomb (RCW 9.61.160)Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 1 (RCW 9A.82.190)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.82.050)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(b))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health care service contractor (RCW 48.44.016(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of health coverage as a health maintenance organization (RCW 48.46.033(3))Â Â Unlawful transaction of insurance business (RCW 48.15.023(3))Â Â Unlicensed practice as an insurance professional (RCW 48.17.063(2))Â Â Use of Proceeds of Criminal Profiteering (RCW 9A.82.080 (1) and (2))Â Â Vehicle Prowling 2 (third or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.52.100(3))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by being under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, or by the operation or driving of a vehicle in a reckless manner (RCW 46.61.522)Â Â Viewing of Depictions of a Minor Engaged in Sexually Explicit Conduct 1 (RCW 9.68A.075(1))Â IIIAnimal Cruelty 1 (RCW 16.52.205)Â Â Animal Fighting (without intentional mutilation) (RCW 16.52.117(2)(a))Â Â Assault 3 (Except Assault 3 of a Peace Officer With a Projectile Stun Gun) (RCW 9A.36.031 except subsection (1)(h))Â Â Assault of a Child 3 (RCW 9A.36.140)Â Â Bail Jumping with class B or C Felony (RCW 9A.76.170(3)(c))Â Â Burglary 2 (RCW 9A.52.030)Â Â Communication with a Minor for Immoral Purposes (RCW 9.68A.090)Â Â Criminal Gang Intimidation (RCW 9A.46.120)Â Â Custodial Assault (RCW 9A.36.100)Â Â Cyber Harassment (RCW 9A.90.120(2)(b))Â Â Escape 2 (RCW 9A.76.120)Â Â Extortion 2 (RCW 9A.56.130)Â Â False Reporting 2 (RCW 9A.84.040(2)(b))Â Â Harassment (RCW 9A.46.020)Â Â Hazing (RCW 28B.10.901(2)(b))Â Â Intimidating a Public Servant (RCW 9A.76.180)Â Â Introducing Contraband 2 (RCW 9A.76.150)Â Â Malicious Injury to Railroad Property (RCW 81.60.070)Â Â Manufacture of Untraceable Firearm with Intent to Sell (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Manufacture or Assembly of an Undetectable Firearm or Untraceable Firearm (RCW 9.41.325)Â Â Mortgage Fraud (RCW 19.144.080)Â Â Negligently Causing Substantial Bodily Harm By Use of a Signal Preemption Device (RCW 46.37.674)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.350(2))Â Â Perjury 2 (RCW 9A.72.030)Â Â Possession of Incendiary Device (RCW 9.40.120)Â Â Possession of Machine Gun, Bump-Fire Stock, Undetectable Firearm, or Short-Barreled Shotgun or Rifle (RCW 9.41.190)Â Â Promoting Prostitution 2 (RCW 9A.88.080)Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 1 (RCW 9A.56.360(2))Â Â Securities Act violation (RCW 21.20.400)Â Â Tampering with a Witness (RCW 9A.72.120)Â Â Telephone Harassment (subsequent conviction or threat of death) (RCW 9.61.230(2))Â Â Theft of Livestock 2 (RCW 9A.56.083)Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 1 (RCW 9A.56.340(2))Â Â Trafficking in Catalytic Converters 2 (RCW 9A.82.200)Â Â Trafficking in Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.82.055)Â Â Unlawful Hunting of Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.410(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Imprisonment (RCW 9A.40.040)Â Â Unlawful Misbranding of Fish or Shellfish 1 (RCW 77.140.060(3))Â Â Unlawful possession of firearm in the second degree (RCW 9.41.040(2))Â Â Unlawful Taking of Endangered Fish or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.120(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 1 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Use of a Nondesignated Vessel (RCW 77.15.530(4))Â Â Vehicular Assault, by the operation or driving of a vehicle with disregard for the safety of others (RCW 46.61.522)Â IICommercial Fishing Without a License 1 (RCW 77.15.500(3)(b))Â Â Computer Trespass 1 (RCW 9A.90.040)Â Â Counterfeiting (RCW 9.16.035(3))Â Â Destruction of critical communications infrastructure (section 7 of this act)Â Â Electronic Data Service Interference (RCW 9A.90.060)Â Â Electronic Data Tampering 1 (RCW 9A.90.080)Â Â Electronic Data Theft (RCW 9A.90.100)Â Â Engaging in Fish Dealing Activity Unlicensed 1 (RCW 77.15.620(3))Â Â Escape from Community Custody (RCW 72.09.310)Â Â Failure to Register as a Sex Offender (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 9A.44.130 prior to June 10, 2010, and RCW 9A.44.132)Â Â Health Care False Claims (RCW 48.80.030)Â Â Identity Theft 2 (RCW 9.35.020(3))Â Â Improperly Obtaining Financial Information (RCW 9.35.010)Â Â Malicious Mischief 1 (RCW 9A.48.070)Â Â Organized Retail Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.350(3))Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 1 (RCW 9A.56.150)Â Â Possession of a Stolen Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.068)Â Â Possession, sale, or offering for sale of seven or more unmarked catalytic converters (RCW 9A.82.180(5))Â Â Retail Theft with Special Circumstances 2 (RCW 9A.56.360(3))Â Â Scrap Processing, Recycling, or Supplying Without a License (second or subsequent offense) (RCW 19.290.100)Â Â Theft 1 (RCW 9A.56.030)Â Â Theft of a Motor Vehicle (RCW 9A.56.065)Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $5,000 or more) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(a))Â Â Theft with the Intent to Resell 2 (RCW 9A.56.340(3))Â Â Trafficking in Insurance Claims (RCW 48.30A.015)Â Â Unlawful factoring of a credit card or payment card transaction (RCW 9A.56.290(4)(a))Â Â Unlawful Participation of Non-Indians in Indian Fishery (RCW 77.15.570(2))Â Â Unlawful Practice of Law (RCW 2.48.180)Â Â Unlawful Purchase or Use of a License (RCW 77.15.650(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Fish, Shellfish, or Wildlife 2 (RCW 77.15.260(3)(a))Â Â Unlicensed Practice of a Profession or Business (RCW 18.130.190(7))Â Â Voyeurism 1 (RCW 9A.44.115)Â IAttempting to Elude a Pursuing Police Vehicle (RCW 46.61.024)Â Â False Verification for Welfare (RCW 74.08.055)Â Â Forgery (RCW 9A.60.020)Â Â Fraudulent Creation or Revocation of a Mental Health Advance Directive (RCW 9A.60.060)Â Â Malicious Mischief 2 (RCW 9A.48.080)Â Â Mineral Trespass (RCW 78.44.330)Â Â Possession of Stolen Property 2 (RCW 9A.56.160)Â Â Reckless Burning 1 (RCW 9A.48.040)Â Â Spotlighting Big Game 1 (RCW 77.15.450(3)(b))Â Â Suspension of Department Privileges 1 (RCW 77.15.670(3)(b))Â Â Taking Motor Vehicle Without Permission 2 (RCW 9A.56.075)Â Â Theft 2 (RCW 9A.56.040)Â Â Theft from a Vulnerable Adult 2 (RCW 9A.56.400(2))Â Â Theft of Rental, Leased, Lease-purchased, or Loaned Property (valued at $750 or more but less than $5,000) (RCW 9A.56.096(5)(b))Â Â Transaction of insurance business beyond the scope of licensure (RCW 48.17.063)Â Â Unlawful Fish and Shellfish Catch Accounting (RCW 77.15.630(3)(b))Â Â Unlawful Issuance of Checks or Drafts (RCW 9A.56.060)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Fictitious Identification (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Instruments of Financial Fraud (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Possession of a Personal Identification Device (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Production of Payment Instruments (RCW 9A.56.320)Â Â Unlawful Releasing, Planting, Possessing, or Placing Deleterious Exotic Wildlife (RCW 77.15.250(2)(b))Â Â Unlawful Trafficking in Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.142)Â Â Unlawful Use of Food Stamps (RCW 9.91.144)Â Â Unlawful Use of Net to Take Fish 1 (RCW 77.15.580(3)(b))Â Â Vehicle Prowl 1 (RCW 9A.52.095)Â Â Violating Commercial Fishing Area or Time 1 (RCW 77.15.550(3)(b))Â --- END ---